District of Columbia statutes.
5-1052

Completion of disciplinary investigations.

The Department shall complete a disciplinary investigation, including issuing findings pursuant to the general orders, of a member regardless of whether that member resigns or retires while under investigation.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 512
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-236, § 2(b), 62 DCR 485